Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 16 Teachers’ Retirement [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-16-13.
Amount of service retirement allowance.

(i) For teachers eligible to retire on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement from service under §

16-16-12

a teacher whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall, receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in accordance with schedule A for service prior to July 1, 2012.

Upon retirement from service under §

16-16-12

a teacher whose membership commenced after July 1, 2005, or who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service as of July 1, 2005, shall receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in accordance with Schedule B for service prior to July 1, 2012.

(ii)

For teachers eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement for service under § 16-16-12, a teacher whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall receive a retirement allowance which shall be determined in accordance with schedule A above for service on before September 30, 2009, and shall be determined in accordance with schedule B in subsection (a)(2) below for service on or after October 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2012:

The retirement allowance of any teacher whose membership commenced before July 1, 2005, and who has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, shall be in an amount equal to the percentage allowance specified in subsection (a)(1) of his or her average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation multiplied by the number of years of total service, but in no case to exceed eighty percent (80%) of the compensation, payable at completion of thirty-five (35) years of service; provided, however, for teachers retiring on or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, the calculation shall be based on the average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation.

The retirement allowance of any teacher whose membership commenced after July 1, 2005, or who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service as of July 1, 2005, shall be in an amount equal to the percentage allowance specified in Schedule B of his or her average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation multiplied by the number of years of total service, but in no case to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the compensation, payable at completion of thirty-eight (38) years of service; provided, however, for teachers retiring on or after October 1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009 the calculation shall be based on the average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation.

Any teacher who has in excess of thirty-five (35) years on or before June 2, 1985, shall not be entitled to any refund, and any teacher with thirty-five (35) years or more on or after June 2, 1985, shall contribute from July 1, 1985, until his or her retirement.

For service prior to July 2012, the retirement allowance of a teacher shall be determined in accordance with subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) above. For service on and after July 1, 2012:

For teachers with fewer than twenty (20) years of total service as of June 30, 2012, a teacher’s retirement allowance shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the teacher’s average compensation multiplied by the teacher’s years of total service on and after July 1, 2012; and

For teachers with twenty (20) or more years of total service as of June 30, 2012, a teacher’s retirement allowance shall be equal to one percent (1%) of the teacher’s average compensation multiplied by the teacher’s years of total service between July 1, 2012, and June 30, 2015, and two percent (2%) of the teacher’s average compensation multiplied by the teacher’s years of total service on and after July 1, 2015. For purposes of computing a teacher’s total service under the preceding sentence, service purchases shall be included in total service only with respect to those service purchases approved prior to June 30, 2012, and those applications for service purchases received by the retirement system on or before June 30, 2012. In no event shall a teacher’s retirement allowance exceed the maximum limitations set forth in subsection (b) above.

SCHEDULE A YEARS OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE ALLOWANCE 1st through 10th inclusive 1.7% 11th through 20th inclusive 1.9% 21st through 34th inclusive 3.0% 35th 2.0%

Click to view

SCHEDULE B YEARS OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE ALLOWANCE 1st through 10th inclusive 1.60% 11th through 20th inclusive 1.80% 21st through 25th inclusive 2.0% 26th through 30th inclusive 2.25% 31st through 37th inclusive 2.50% 38th 2.25%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 4; P.L. 1950, ch. 2607, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-13

; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 1, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 476, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 12.

16-16-13.1.
Teachers with more than 30 years of service — Amount of service retirement allowance — Minimum and maximum limitations.

In the case of any teacher who is a member of the employees’ retirement system of the state created by chapter 8 of title 36 who, at the time of retirement, has had at least thirty (30) years or more of total service, the teacher shall receive an annual retirement allowance of not less than thirty-four hundred dollars ($3,400) per year with an additional increment of two hundred dollars ($200) for each additional year of service up through a total of thirty-eight (38) years to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000); provided that this section shall not apply in the case of any teacher who has elected an option for payment of pension and has thereby reduced the amount received to less than the amounts set forth in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 390, § 1.

16-16-14.
Retirement for ordinary disability.

Application for ordinary disability may be made by a teacher, his or her department head, or a person acting in the teacher’s behalf, while in active service or on leave of absence for illness, provided that the teacher has had five (5) or more years of total service of which at least three (3) consecutive years shall have been as a teacher, and the teacher is not entitled to a regular service retirement allowance. A statement from a physician shall accompany the application stating that the teacher is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of duty and that he or she should be retired.

A medical examination of the teacher shall be made by three (3) physicians engaged by the retirement board for this purpose, and should the medical examination show that the teacher is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of duty and ought to be retired, the physicians shall so report and certify to the retirement board and the retirement board, may retire the teacher for ordinary disability.

The retirement board shall establish uniform eligibility requirements, standards, and criteria for ordinary disability which shall apply to all members who make application for retirement for ordinary disability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 4.

16-16-15.
Amount of ordinary disability benefit.

Upon retirement for ordinary disability under §

16-16-14

, a teacher shall receive a benefit equal to the rate prescribed for service retirement under §

16-16-13

subject to the provisions of §

16-16-20

; provided, however, that no teacher retiring with less than ten (10) years of total service shall receive a benefit less than he or she would have received if he or she had ten (10) years of total service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 4; P.L. 1993, ch. 360, § 2.

16-16-16.
Retirement for accidental disability.

Medical examination of an active teacher for accidental disability, and investigation of all statements and certificates by him or her or in his or her behalf in connection with the accidental disability, shall be made upon the application of the head of the department in which the teacher is employed or upon application of the teacher, or of a person acting in his or her behalf, stating that the teacher is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of service as a natural and proximate result of an accident, while in the performance of duty, and certify the definite time, place, and conditions of the duty performed by the teacher resulting in the alleged disability, and that the alleged disability is not the result of willful negligence or misconduct on the part of the teacher, and is not the result of age or length of service, and that the teacher should, therefore, be retired.

The application shall be made within five (5) years of the alleged accident from which the injury has resulted in the teacher’s present disability, and shall be accompanied by an accident report and a physician’s report certifying to the disability; provided, that, if the teacher was able to return to his or her employment and subsequently reinjures or aggravates the same injury, the application shall be made within the later of five (5) years of the alleged accident or three (3) years of the reinjury or aggravation. The application may also state that the teacher is permanently and totally disabled from any employment.

If a medical examination conducted by three (3) physicians engaged by the retirement board, and any investigation that the retirement board may desire to make, shall show that the teacher is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of service as a natural and proximate result of an accident, while in the performance of duty, and that the disability is not the result of willful negligence or misconduct on the part of the teacher, and is not the result of age or length of service, and that the teacher has not attained the age of sixty-five (65) years, and that the teacher should be retired, the physicians who conducted the examination shall so certify to the retirement board stating the time, place, and conditions of service performed by the teacher resulting in the disability, and the retirement board may grant the teacher an accidental disability benefit.

The retirement board shall establish uniform eligibility requirements, standards, and criteria for accidental disability which shall apply to all members who make application for accidental disability benefits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 4.

16-16-17.
Amount of accidental disability benefit.

For disability applications submitted on or before September 30, 2009, upon retirement for accidental disability under §

16-16-16

a teacher shall receive a benefit that shall be equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of his or her annual compensation at the time of his or her retirement, subject to the provisions of §

16-16-20

.

Upon any application for accidental disability submitted after October 1, 2009, if the teacher has been found to be permanently and totally disabled from service but has not been found by the board to be permanently and totally disabled from any employment as a result of his/her accidental disability, a teacher shall receive a retirement allowance equal to fifty percent (50%) of the rate of the teacher’s compensation at the date of the teacher’s retirement subject to the provisions of §

16-16-20

. The retiree shall, as a condition of continued receipt of a disability retirement allowance, on or before a date fixed by the retirement board, annually under penalties of perjury provide the board with such affidavits and accurate evidence of earnings, employment and gainful activity as the board may require, including, but not limited to, joint and/or individual tax returns. Payment of the disability retirement allowance shall continue as long as the individual remains disabled, and regardless of service or age. Upon retirement for accidental disability that has been found by the board to be permanently and totally disabling from any employment, a teacher shall receive a retirement allowance equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the rate of the teacher’s compensation at the date of the teacher’s retirement subject to the provisions of §

16-16-20

. The retirement board shall apply the terms of subsection

28-33-17(b)

in determining total disability.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 4.

16-16-18.
Disability benefits pending final decision on application.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of chapters 3 and 4 of title 36, and/or any existing regulations of the director of administration or the state retirement board, the state retirement board shall accord to a teacher, so entitled under present existing regulations, the minimum retirement benefits pending a decision upon any disability retirement of the teacher; provided, however, the granting of the minimum retirement shall not estop the teacher, so claiming disability, from any disability retirement consideration by the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 4.

16-16-19.
Reexamination of disability beneficiaries — Reduction of benefit — Reinstatement to active service.

Once each year the retirement board may, and upon his or her application shall, require any disability beneficiary under the minimum age of service retirement to undergo a medical examination, the examination to be made at the place of residence of the beneficiary, or other place mutually agreed upon, by a physician or physicians engaged by the retirement board. If the examination indicates that the beneficiary is able to engage in a gainful occupation, his or her name shall be placed on appropriate lists of candidates prepared for appointment to positions in his or her department or agency for which he or she is stated to be qualified, of a salary grade not exceeding that from which he or she was last retired. Should the beneficiary be engaged in a gainful occupation or should he or she be offered service as a result of the placing of his or her name on a list of candidates, the retirement board shall adjust, and, from time to time readjust, the amount of his or her disability benefit to an amount which shall not exceed the rate of benefit upon which he or she was originally retired, and which, when added to the amount then earnable by him or her, shall not exceed his or her rate of annual compensation currently for the classification that the disability annuitant held prior to retirement. Should any disability beneficiary under the minimum age of service retirement refuse to submit to one medical examination in any year by a physician or physicians designated by the retirement board, his or her benefit shall be discontinued until his or her withdrawal of the refusal, and should his or her refusal continue for one year, all his or her rights in and to the benefit shall be revoked by the retirement board. A disability beneficiary, reinstated to active service, shall be reinstated as a member and participate in the rights of the retirement system, to the same extent as any other teacher.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 4.

16-16-20.
Deduction of amounts received from workers’ compensation or as damages.

Any amount paid or payable under the provisions of any workers’ compensation law, exclusive of Medicare set aside allocations, specific compensation benefits or any benefits due pursuant to the terms of a collective bargaining agreement or as the result of any action for damages for personal injuries against the state, on account of the death or disability of a teacher, shall be offset against and payable in lieu of any benefits payable out of funds provided by the state under the provisions of this chapter on account of the death or disability of the teacher. If the value of the total commuted benefits under any workers’ compensation law or action is less than the present value on an actuarial basis of the benefits otherwise payable under this chapter, the value of the commuted payments shall be deducted from the present value of the benefits, and the balance thereof shall be payable under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 4; P.L. 2022, ch. 247, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 248, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

16-16-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, §§ 4, 5; P.L. 1952, ch. 3000, § 3; G.L. 1956, §§

16-16-15

—

16-16-21

; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 169, § 1.

16-16-22.
Contributions to state system.

Prior to July 1, 2012, each teacher shall contribute into the system nine and one-half percent (9.5%) of compensation as his or her share of the cost of annuities, benefits, and allowances. Effective July 1, 2012, each teacher shall contribute an amount equal to three and three quarters percent (3.75%) of his or her compensation. Effective July 1, 2015, each teacher with twenty (20) or more years of total service as of June 30, 2012, shall contribute an amount equal to eleven percent (11%) of his or her compensation. The employer contribution on behalf of teacher members of the system shall be in an amount that will pay a rate percent of the compensation paid to the members, according to the method of financing prescribed in the state retirement act in chapters 8 — 10 and 10.3 of title 36. This amount shall be paid forty percent (40%) by the state and sixty percent (60%) by the city, town, local educational agency, or any formalized commissioner-approved cooperative service arrangement by whom the teacher members are employed, with the exception of teachers who work in federally funded projects and further with the exception of any supplemental contributions by a local municipality employer under chapter 10.3 of title 36 which supplemental employer contributions shall be made wholly by the local municipality. Provided, however, that the rate percent paid shall be rounded to the nearest hundredth of one percent (.01%).

The employer contribution on behalf of teacher members of the system who work in fully or partially federally funded programs shall be prorated in accordance with the share of the contribution paid from the funds of the federal, city, town, or local educational agency, or any formalized commissioner-approved cooperative service arrangement by whom the teacher members are employed.

In case of the failure of any city, town, or local educational agency, or any formalized commissioner-approved cooperative service arrangement, to pay to the state retirement system the amounts due from it under this section within the time prescribed, the general treasurer is authorized to deduct the amount from any money due the city, town, or local educational agency from the state.

The employer’s contribution shared by the state shall be paid in the amounts prescribed in this section for the city, town, or local educational agency and under the same payment schedule. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the city, town, or local educational agency or any formalized commissioner-approved cooperative service arrangement shall remit to the general treasurer of the state the local employer’s share of the teacher’s retirement on the date contributions are withheld but no later than three (3) business days following the pay period ending in which contributions were withheld. The amounts that would have been contributed shall be deposited by the state in a special fund and not used for any purpose. The general treasurer, upon receipt of the local employer’s share, shall effect transfer of a matching amount of money from the state funds appropriated for this purpose by the general assembly into the retirement fund.

Upon reconciliation of the final amount owed to the retirement fund for the employer share, the state shall ensure that any local education aid reduction assumed for the FY 2010 revised budget in excess of the actual savings is restored to the respective local entities.

This section is not subject to §§

45-13-7

through

45-13-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 6; P.L. 1949, ch. 2375, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-22

; P.L. 1958, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 168, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 509, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 36; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 10, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 9; P.L. 2010, ch. 9, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 10, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 13; P.L. 2019, ch. 205, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 271, § 4; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 7.

16-16-22.1.
City or town payment of teacher member contributions.

Each city or town, pursuant to the provisions of § 414(h)(2) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 414(h)(2), may, pursuant to appropriate local action by the city or town, pick up and pay the contributions that would be payable by the employees as teacher members under §

16-16-22

. The contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code. Employee contributions picked up pursuant to this section shall be treated and identified as teacher member contributions for all purposes of the retirement system except as specifically provided to the contrary in this section.

Teacher member contributions picked up by a city or town shall be paid from the same source of funds used for the payment of compensation to a teacher member. A deduction shall be made from a teacher member’s compensation equal to the amount of his or her contributions picked up by his or her city or town employer. This deduction, however, shall not reduce his or her compensation for purposes of computing benefits under the retirement system pursuant to this chapter or chapter 10 of title 36. Picked up contributions shall be transmitted to the retirement system in accordance with the provisions of §

16-16-22

and §

36-10-1

on the date contributions are withheld but no later than three (3) business days following the pay period ending in which contributions were withheld.

Every employer is required to deduct and withhold member contributions and to transmit same to the retirement system and is hereby made liable for the contribution. In addition, any amount of employee contributions actually deducted and withheld shall be deemed to be a special fund in trust for the benefit of the member and shall be transmitted to the retirement system as set forth herein.

The liability of an employer who fails to segregate these trust funds, or refuses to deduct and withhold member contributions from its employees, is enforceable by the retirement board through an appropriate action in the superior court. The general treasurer is also authorized to deduct the amount due from any money due the employer from the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 37, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10; P.L. 2019, ch. 205, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 271, § 4.

16-16-23.
Applicability of public employees’ retirement law.

Except as specifically provided otherwise in this chapter, all provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of title 36 shall extend and apply to the persons made members of the retirement system by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2101, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-16-23

.

16-16-24.
Substitute teaching and employment after retirement.

Any teacher or athletic coach certified pursuant to chapter 11.1 of this title, who has retired under the provisions of any law of this state, may substitute as a teacher at state schools and in the public schools of this state for a period of no more than ninety (90) days in any one school year without any forfeiture of, or reduction in, the retirement benefits and allowances the teacher is receiving, or may receive, as a retired teacher. Notice of the employment shall be sent monthly to the state retirement board by the school committee employing the teacher and by the employer and by the retired teacher at the end of each teaching assignment.

Any teacher or athletic coach certified pursuant to chapter 11.1 of this title, who has retired under the provisions of any law of this state, may be employed to fill a vacant position (including, but not limited to, employment as a tutor, mentor principal, or mentor assistant principal) by any state school or public school of this state for a period of no more than ninety (90) days in any one school year without any forfeiture of, or reduction in, the retirement benefits and allowances he or she is receiving, or may receive, as a retiree. Notice of the employment shall be sent monthly to the state retirement board by the employer and by the retired teacher. Provided, however, that no employment may be offered to a retiree subject to this section after July 1, 2002, unless the employer has made a good-faith effort each school year to fill the position with a nonretired employee without success, and certifies, in writing, that it has done so to the employees’ retirement system and to the bargaining agents of all education unions with whom the employer has collective-bargaining agreements.

Any retired teacher or athletic coach may be employed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b), but in no event shall employment exceed ninety (90) days.

The calculation of the ninety-day (90) period in any one school year shall be determined by either of the following methods:

Three (3) hours shall constitute a half day and the number of half days shall be limited to one hundred eighty (180) half days, which shall be the equivalent of ninety (90) full days; or

Each period per day shall constitute one-fifth (1/5) of a teaching day. Any teacher hired to teach two (2) periods per day shall be deemed to have worked seventy-two (72) full days per year. The computation is two-fifths times one hundred eighty (2/5 x 180) school days per year, which shall be equivalent to seventy-two (72) full days per year.

Any retired member of the employees retirement system of Rhode Island under title 36 or 45, who is certified as a substitute teacher, may substitute as a teacher at state schools and in the public schools of this state for a period of no more than ninety (90) days in any one school year without any forfeiture of, or reduction in, the retirement benefits and allowances the substitute teacher is receiving, or may receive, as a retiree under any title. The other provisions of subsections (b) through (d) shall also be deemed to apply.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 48; P.L. 2000, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 430, § 1.

16-16-24.1.
Substitute teaching and post-retirement employment related to COVID-19.

Notwithstanding any public or general law, or rule or regulation to the contrary, any teacher, administrator, or staff member who has retired under the provisions of title 16, 36, or 45 may, as part of the public health crisis caused by COVID-19, exceed the ninety-day (90) cap on post-retirement employment upon:

A determination by the local education authority that there exists a specialized need, within their authority, to fill positions on a temporary basis, that may exceed the ninety-day (90) cap on post-retirement employment;

There exists a good-faith basis that those retired teachers, administrators, and staff members being asked to exceed the ninety-day (90) cap on post-retirement employment possess the skills, training, and knowledge necessary to help address the public health crisis, caused by COVID-19; and

The local education authority has notified the state retirement board that it has determined that exceeding the ninety-day (90) cap on post-retirement employment is necessary to help address the public health crisis caused by COVID-19.

Any teacher, administrator, or staff member who has retired under the provisions of title 16, 36, or 45, and has been employed or re-employed under the provisions of this section, shall not be entitled to additional service credits for such employment.

Unless extended by the general assembly, this section shall sunset upon the conclusion of the 2021-2022 school year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 7, § 1, effective March 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 8, § 1, effective March 28, 2022.

16-16-25.
Eligibility for survivor’s benefits — Payment.

A member’s dependents or survivors shall be eligible to receive the benefits provided in §§

16-16-25

through

16-16-38

if the member shall have made regular contributions to the teachers’ survivors benefit fund as provided in §

16-16-34

for a period of at least six (6) consecutive calendar months prior to his or her death or retirement, as the case may be. These benefits shall be payable the first of the month following that month in which eligibility for the benefits occurs and shall be paid at the same time as the regular retirement allowance payments are made. No payment shall be due for the month in which ineligibility occurs. No widow’s or mother’s or domestic partner’s benefit payable under §§

16-16-25

through

16-16-38

shall be reduced because of benefits payable to other dependents of the deceased member under the provisions of §§ 16-16-25 through 16-16-38.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1963, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 6.

16-16-26.
Spouse’s or domestic partner’s benefits.

Spouse’s and domestic partner’s benefits are payable following the decease of a member as provided in §§

16-16-25

—

16-16-38

.

The spouse or domestic partner shall be entitled to benefits upon attaining the age of sixty (60) years.

The spouse or domestic partner was living with the deceased member at the time of the member’s death. A spouse or domestic partner is deemed to have been living with the deceased member if they were both members of the same household on the date of the deceased member’s death, or the spouse or domestic partner was receiving regular contributions from the deceased member toward support on that date, or the deceased member had been ordered by a court to contribute to the spouse’s or domestic partner’s support.

Remarriage of the spouse or domestic partner or establishment of a domestic partnership shall render him or her ineligible to receive current or future benefits under this section.

The spouse or domestic partner of a member, as defined in this section, shall be entitled to monthly benefits payable in accordance with the following table:

A yearly cost-of-living adjustment for spouse’s or domestic partner’s benefits shall be based on the annual social security adjustment.

Spouse's or Domestic Highest Annual Partner's Monthly Salary Minimum Benefit $17,000 or less $825 $17,001 to $25,000 $963 $25,001 to $33,000 $1,100 $33,001 to $40,000 $1,238 $40,001 and over $1,375

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 590, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 547, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 6; P.L. 2017, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 413, § 1.

16-16-27.
Family benefits.

Family benefits shall be payable upon the decease of the member as provided in §§

16-16-25

through

16-16-38

if at the time of the member’s death the surviving spouse or domestic partner:

Has in his or her care a child of the deceased member entitled to child benefits;

Is not entitled to a spouse’s or domestic partner’s benefit as provided in this chapter; and

Was living with the deceased member at the time of his or her death.

Family benefits shall be payable in accordance with the following table.

The monthly benefit shall be equal to the benefit that would be available to a spouse or domestic partner under §

16-16-26

multiplied by the following percentages:

Family benefits as set forth in this section are payable to the former spouse or to a former domestic partner divorced of a deceased member, if the former spouse or to a former domestic partner divorced:

Has in his or her care a child of the deceased member who is his or her son, daughter, or legally adopted child entitled to child benefits payable on the basis of the deceased member’s salary;

Was receiving from the deceased member, pursuant to agreement or court order, at least one-half (1/2) of his or her support at the time of the deceased member’s death;

Is not entitled to a spouse’s or domestic partner’s benefit as provided in §§

16-16-25

through

16-16-38

.

The family monthly benefit shall be payable in accordance with the table set forth in this section. A spouse or domestic partner who no longer qualifies for benefits under this section because his or her child or children have attained the age of eighteen (18) years or twenty-three (23) years and a full time student shall be entitled to receive monthly benefits upon attaining sixty (60) years of age in accordance with the benefits set forth in §

16-16-26

. The family benefits provided under this section shall cease upon the remarriage of the surviving spouse or domestic partner or establishment of a domestic partnership.

Parent and 1 Child Parent and 2 Children Parent and morethan 2 Children One Child Alone Two Children Alone Three or more Children Alone 150% 175% 175% 75% 150% 175%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 498, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 485, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 6.

16-16-28.
Children’s benefits.

Children’s benefits are payable to the child, including a stepchild or adopted child of a deceased member, if:

The child is unmarried and under the age of eighteen (18) years or twenty-three (23) years and a full time student, and was dependent upon the member at the time of the member’s death; or

The dependent child regardless of age was under a disability which began before the child attained the age of eighteen (18) years. A child shall not be considered disabled unless proof is furnished to the retirement board.

A child is considered dependent if living with the member at the time of the member’s death and he or she was contributing to the support of the child. If the member at the time of the member’s death was not living with the child or contributing to the child’s support, the child, if legitimate, is considered dependent upon the member unless the child:

Was adopted by some other individual; or

Was living with and receiving more than one-half (1/2) of his or her support from either one or both stepparents.

An adopted child is considered dependent upon his or her adopting parents under the same conditions as those that apply to parents and their natural children.

A child is considered dependent upon either one or both stepparents at the time of the death if the child was:

Living with his or her stepparent(s); or

Receiving at least one-half (1/2) of his or her support from either one or both of the stepparents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 498, § 1.

16-16-29.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1983, ch. 217, § 2. For present provisions of law concerning spouse’s benefits, see §

16-16-26

.

16-16-30.
Parent’s benefits.

Parent’s benefits are payable to the parent or parents of a deceased member if the member did not leave a widow, widower, or child who could ever qualify for monthly benefits on the member’s wages and the parent:

Has reached the age of sixty (60) years;

Has not remarried or entered into a domestic partnership after the death of the member;

Was receiving at least one-half (1/2) of his or her support from the member at the time of the member’s death and filed proof of his or her support within two (2) years of the date of death; and

Is not entitled to a federal or state old age benefit based on his or her own earnings equal to or greater than the amount he or she would be entitled to as the dependent parent of the deceased member.

A parent’s benefit shall be payable monthly in accordance with the benefits set forth in §

16-16-26

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 6.

16-16-31.
Refund on termination prior to retirement.

A member withdrawing from service prior to retirement shall be entitled to a refund equal to the total amount contributed by him or her to the teachers’ survivors benefit fund, without interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1.

16-16-32.
Refund on retirement.

A member at the date of retirement in lieu of the survivors benefits provided in §§

16-16-25

—

16-16-38

may elect to receive a lump sum payment equal to his or her contributions to the teachers’ survivors benefit fund, plus interest. Any member who retired prior to the effective date of this legislation shall have one hundred twenty (120) days from the effective date of this legislation to elect to receive a lump sum payment equal to his or her contributions to the teachers’ survivors benefit fund, plus interest. Interest is to be calculated and payable only up to the date of retirement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 551, § 1.

16-16-33.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; Repealed by amendment provisions of P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1. For present law, see §

16-16-31

.

16-16-34.
Member leaving no survivors — Reversion.

In the case of any member who dies while in service leaving no dependents or survivors as defined in §§

16-16-1

,

16-16-11

, and

16-16-25

through

16-16-38

, his or her accumulated contributions to the teachers’ survivors benefit fund plus interest shall be payable to the person or persons that he or she may designate to the retirement board or in the absence of a designation to his or her estate.

Contributions made by a member who at the date of retirement did not exercise the election provided in §

16-16-32

and who dies without leaving survivors as defined in this chapter shall become part of the reserve of the fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1966, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1.